Florida, session 2026, HB99.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (b) and (g) of subsection (2) of
section 626.7492, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
626.7492 Reinsurance intermediaries.—
(2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section:
(b) "Controlling person" means having the direct or
indirect power, as a any person, firm, association, or
corporation, who directly or indirectly has the power to direct
or cause to be directed, the management, control, or activities
of the reinsurance intermediary.
(g) "Reinsurance intermediary manager" means any person
who has authority to bind, or manages all or part of, the
assumed reinsurance business of a reinsurer, including the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb99-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 99 2026
management of a separate division, department, or underwriting
office, and acts as a representative for the reinsurer whether
known as a reinsurance intermediary manager, manager, or other
similar term. Notwithstanding the above, none of the following
persons is a reinsurance intermediary manager with respect to
the reinsurer for the purposes of this section:
1. An employee of the reinsurer;
2. A manager of the United States branch of an alien
reinsurer;
3. An underwriting manager which, pursuant to contract,
manages all the reinsurance operations of the reinsurer, is
under common control with the reinsurer, subject to the holding
company act, and whose compensation is not based on the volume
of premiums written.
4. The manager of a group, association, pool, or
organization of insurers which engage in joint underwriting or
joint reinsurance and who are subject to examination by the
insurance regulatory authority of the state in which the
manager's principal business office is located.
5. An underwriting manager which manages assumed
facultative risks for a reinsurer if the facultative reinsurance
business managed by the underwriting manager is less than 10
percent of the assumed annual gross written premium of the
reinsurer.
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb99-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 99 2026
made by this act to section 626.7492, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
626.022, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
626.022 Scope of part.—
(1) This part applies as to insurance agents, service
representatives, adjusters, and insurance agencies; as to any
and all kinds of insurance; and as to stock insurers, mutual
insurers, reciprocal insurers, and all other types of insurers,
except that:
(a) It does not apply as to reinsurance, except that ss.
626.011-626.022, ss. 626.112-626.181, ss. 626.191-626.211, ss.
626.291-626.301, s. 626.331, ss. 626.342-626.511, ss. 626.541-
626.591, and ss. 626.601-626.711 shall apply as to reinsurance
intermediaries as defined in s. 626.7492.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb99-00